Utah statutes.
70A-9a-518.   Claim concerning inaccurate or wrongfully filed record.
(1)  A person may file in the filing office a correction statement with
respect to a record indexed there under the person's name if the person
believes that the record is inaccurate or was wrongfully filed.
(2)  A correction statement must:
(a)  identify the record to which it relates by:
(i)  the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the
record relates; and
(ii)  if the correction statement relates to a record filed or recorded in a
filing office described in Subsection 70A-9a-501(1)(a):
(A) (I)  the entry number of the initial financing statement; or
(II)  the book and page where that the initial financing statement was filed
or recorded; and
(B)  the information specified in Subsection 70A-9a-502(2);
(b)  indicate that it is a correction statement; and
(c)  provide the basis for the person's belief that the record is inaccurate
and indicate the manner in which the person believes the record should be
amended to cure any inaccuracy or provide the basis for the person's belief
that the record was wrongfully filed.
(3) The filing of a correction statement does not affect the effectiveness of
an initial financing statement or other filed record.
